Washington statutes.
RCW 18.25.100

Prosecutions for violations.

It shall be the duty of the several prosecuting attorneys of this state to prosecute all persons charged with the violation of any of the provisions of this chapter. It shall be the duty of the secretary to aid said attorneys of this state in the enforcement of this chapter.

[ 1991 c 3 s 42; 1919 c 5 s 16; RRS s 10110.]